Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1447
Committee treasurer; statements or reports; duties; committee records; violation; penalty.

(1) The committee treasurer shall keep detailed accounts, records, bills, and receipts necessary to substantiate the information contained in a statement or report filed pursuant to sections 49-1445 to 49-1479.02 or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

(2)(a) For any committee other than a candidate committee, the committee treasurer shall be responsible for filing all statements and reports of the committee required to be filed under the act and shall be personally liable subject to section 49-1461.01 for any late filing fees, civil penalties, and interest that may be due under the act as a result of a failure to make such filings.

(b) For candidate committees, the candidate shall be responsible for filing all statements and reports required to be filed by his or her candidate committee under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act or the Campaign Finance Limitation Act. The candidate shall be personally liable for any late filing fees, civil penalties, and interest that may be due under either act as a result of a failure to make such filings and may use funds of the candidate committee to pay such fees, penalties, and interest.

(3) The committee treasurer shall record the name and address of each person from whom a contribution is received except for contributions of fifty dollars or less received pursuant to subsection (2) of section 49-1472.

(4) The records of a committee shall be preserved for five years and shall be made available for inspection as authorized by the commission.

(5) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 47;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 41;

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 13.

Campaign Finance Limitation Act, see section 32-1601.

A candidate for an elective state office is responsible for filing all statements and reports required to be filed by his or her candidate committee pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act and the Campaign Finance Limitation Act. Nebraska Legislature on behalf of State v. Hergert, 271 Neb. 976, 720 N.W.2d 372 (2006).